apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="w/erven__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>erf</l>       <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erft</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erven</l>     <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erven</l>     <r>erven<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierven</l>    <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierf</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierf</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierf</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ervend</l>    <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erven</l>     <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erf</l>       <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erft</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erft</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erven</l>     <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erve</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erve</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erve</l>      <r>erven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="g/even__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eef</l>       <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeft</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>even</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>even</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evend</l>     <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>even</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eef</l>       <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeft</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeft</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>even</l>      <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eve</l>       <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eve</l>       <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eve</l>       <r>even<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kl/ieven__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ief</l>       <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieft</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieven</l>     <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieven</l>     <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oven</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oof</l>       <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oof</l>       <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oof</l>       <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ievend</l>    <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieven</l>     <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ief</l>       <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieft</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieft</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieven</l>     <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieve</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieve</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieve</l>      <r>ieven<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zw/emmen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emt</l>       <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmen</l>     <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmen</l>     <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommen</l>     <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmend</l>    <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmen</l>     <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emt</l>       <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emt</l>       <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmen</l>     <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emme</l>      <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emme</l>      <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emme</l>      <r>emmen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="geven">           <i>g</i><par n="g/even__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="besterven">       <i>best</i><par n="w/erven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klieven">         <i>kl</i><par n="kl/ieven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="werven">          <i>w</i><par n="w/erven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vergeven">        <i>verg</i><par n="g/even__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verwerven">       <i>verw</i><par n="w/erven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begeven">         <i>beg</i><par n="g/even__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omzwerven">       <i>omzw</i><par n="w/erven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sterven">         <i>st</i><par n="w/erven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zwemmen">         <i>zw</i><par n="zw/emmen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zwerven">         <i>zw</i><par n="w/erven__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omgeven">         <i>omg</i><par n="g/even__vblex"/></e>
